Washington statutes.
RCW 27.04.900

State library commission—Transfer of functions to office of the secretary of state.

(1) The state library commission is hereby abolished and its powers, duties, and functions are hereby transferred to the office of the secretary of state. All references to the state library commission in the Revised Code of Washington shall be construed to mean the secretary of state or the office of the secretary of state.

(2)(a) All reports, documents, surveys, books, records, files, papers, or written material in the possession of the state library commission or the state library shall be delivered to the custody of the office of the secretary of state. All cabinets, furniture, office equipment, motor vehicles, and other tangible property employed by the state library commission or the state library shall be made available to the office of the secretary of state. All funds, credits, or other assets held by the state library commission or the state library shall be assigned to the office of the secretary of state.

(b) Any appropriations made to the state library commission or the state library shall, on July 1, 2002, be transferred and credited to the office of the secretary of state.

(c) If any question arises as to the transfer of any personnel, funds, books, documents, records, papers, files, equipment, or other tangible property used or held in the exercise of the powers and the performance of the duties and functions transferred, the director of financial management shall make a determination as to the proper allocation and certify the same to the state agencies concerned.

(3) All employees of the state library commission and the state library are transferred to the jurisdiction of the office of the secretary of state. All employees classified under chapter 41.06 RCW, the state civil service law, are assigned to the office of the secretary of state to perform their usual duties upon the same terms as formerly, without any loss of rights, subject to any action that may be appropriate thereafter in accordance with the laws and rules governing state civil service.

(4) All rules and all pending business before the state library commission or the state library shall be continued and acted upon by the office of the secretary of state. All existing contracts and obligations shall remain in full force and shall be performed by the office of the secretary of state.

(5) The transfer of the powers, duties, functions, and personnel of the state library commission and the state library shall not affect the validity of any act performed before July 1, 2002.

(6) If apportionments of budgeted funds are required because of the transfers directed by this section, the director of financial management shall certify the apportionments to the agencies affected, the state auditor, and the state treasurer. Each of these shall make the appropriate transfer and adjustments in funds and appropriation accounts and equipment records in accordance with the certification.

(7) Nothing contained in this section may be construed to alter any existing collective bargaining unit or the provisions of any existing collective bargaining agreement until the agreement has expired or until the bargaining unit has been modified by action of the personnel resources board as provided by law.

(8) Subsequent to the merger of the state library into the office of the secretary of state, any reduction-in-force actions that occur on or before June 30, 2005, with respect to positions within the boundaries of the individual agency as the agencies existed on June 30, 2002, shall afford lay-off rights only to those positions that were within the boundaries of the respective individual agency as the agencies existed on June 30, 2002.

[ 2002 c 342 s 1.]